src/fst/morphology/stems/sme-abbreviations.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! =============================================
!! # File containing North Saami abbreviations
! =============================================

!! ## Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

!! Splitting in 4 + 1 groups, because of the preprocessor
!  - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation-sme !!= * **@CODE@**
ITRAB ;	  !!= 1. The @CODE@ lexicon (intransitive abbrs)
TRNUMAB ; !!= 1. The @CODE@ lexicon (abbrs trans wrt. numberals)
TRAB ;	  !!= 1. The @CODE@ lexicon (transitive abbrs)
NOAB ;	  !!= 1. The @CODE@ lexicon (not really abbrs)
NUMNOAB ; !!= 1. The @CODE@ lexicon (not behaving as abbr before num)

!! ## The abbreviation lexicon itself
! ----------------------------------


! ==========================
! Intransitive abbreviations
! ==========================

LEXICON NOAB !!= * **@CODE@** du, gen, jur

!! This class contains homonyms, which are both intransitive
!! abbreviations and normal words. The abbreviation usage
!! is less common and thus only the occurences in the middle of
!! the sentnece (when next word has small letters) can be
!! considered as true cases.

du+N+Sem/Cat:du ab-dot-noun-noab ; ! dualis
gen+N+Sem/Cat:gen ab-dot-noun-noab ; ! genitiivi
jur+A+Sem/Domain_Hum:jur ab-dot-adj-noab ; ! juridihkalaš

! ============================================================
! Abreviations who are transitive in front of numerals
! ============================================================

LEXICON TRNUMAB !!= * **@CODE@** contains abbreviations who are transitive in front of numerals

!! For abbrs for which numerals are complements, but other
!! words not necessarily are. This group treats arabic numerals as
!! if it were transitive but letters as if it were intransitive.

! TODO: Bug the fact that these abbrs do not distinguish between
! cap and small letters, whereast he ITRAB ones do.

Apd+N:Apd ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;
Buš+N+Sem/Money:Buš ab-noun-trnumab ;
Gieldanr+N+Sem/Sign:Gieldanr ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;
Lág+N:Lág ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;
Mearr.S.nr+N+Sem/Sign:Mearr.S.nr ab-noun-trnumab ;
Poastanr+N+Sem/Sign:Poastanr ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;
RevBuš+N+Sem/Money:RevBuš ab-noun-trnumab ;
Suohkannr+N+Sem/Sign:Suohkannr ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;
Sál+N:Sál ab-noun-trnumab ;
alm+A:alm ab-dot-adj-trnumab ;
arkiivaáššenr+N+Sem/Sign+Err/Orth:arkiiváššenr ab-noun-trnumab ;
arkiivaáššenr+N+Sem/Sign:arkiivaáššenr ab-noun-trnumab ;
b+Adv+Sem/Time:b ab-adv-trnumab ; ! trab in 12. b. 2001 and "lea 30. b. mearidán…, but not in "Bohten geassemánu 3. b. Lean velá dáppe."
djd+N:djd ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;
dmu+Adv+Sem/Time:dmu ab-adv-numnoab ; ! diibmu
tii+Adv+Sem/Time:tii ab-adv-numnoab ; ! tiibma
fáksanr+N+Sem/Sign+Err/Orth:fáksanr ab-nodot-noun-trnumab ;
fáksanr+N+Sem/Sign:fáksanr ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;
gieldanr+N+Sem/Sign+Err/Orth:gieldanr ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
gozihankom+N+Sem/Org:gozihankom ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;
lá+N+Sem/Time:lá ab-nodot-noun-trnumab ; ! lávvordat
rieg+V:rieg ab-dot-IVprfprc-trnumab ; ! riegádan
rievd+V:rievd ab-dot-verb-trnumab ;
ráđđ+N+Sem/Org:ráđđ ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;
Árv.% nr+N+Sem/Sign:Árv.% nr ab-noun-trnumab ;
áššenr+N+Sem/Sign+Err/Orth-a-á:aššenr ab-dot-noun-trnumab ;
áššenr+N+Sem/Sign:áššenr ab-noun-trnumab ;
čk+Adv:čk ab-dot-adv-trnumab ;

! ===============================================
! Transitive abbreviations
! ===============================================

LEXICON NUMNOAB !!= * **@CODE@** su, dii

!! This class contains homonyms, which are both abbrs for
!! which numerals are complements and normal words. The abbreviation usage
!! is less common and thus only the occurences in the middle of
!! the sentence can be considered as true cases.

dii+Adv+Sem/Time:dii ab-adv-numnoab ; ! diibmu, La stå!
su+Adv:su ab-dot-adv-numnoab ; ! La stå!
